District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.08

Commodities sold by weight; “ton” defined.

When any commodity is sold by weight it shall be net weight. When any commodity is sold by the ton, it shall be understood to mean 2,000 pounds avoirdupois.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1219, ch. 118, § 8
Mar. 31, 1945, 59 Stat. 45, ch. 46, § 1
1973 Ed., § 10-108.
1981 Ed., § 10-109.